en: Lawn Aerators & Dethatchers
xx: Lawn Aerators & Dethatchers
cs: Provzdušňovače trávníku a vertikulátory
da: Plæneluftere og vertikalskærere
de: Rasenlüfter und Vertikutierer
es: Aireadores y sopladores de césped
fr: Aérateurs de gazon et scarificateurs, Aérateur démousseur thermique, Démousseur thermique, Scarificateur thermique
it: Aeratori e depagliatori per prati
ja: 芝生エアレーター/デサッチャー
nl: Gazonbeluchters en -verticuteerders
no: Plenluftere og skogsharver
pl: Aeratory i urządzenia oczyszczające do trawników
pt: Arejadores e ancinhos de gramado
ru: Аэраторы и вертикуттеры
sv: Gräsmatteluftare och -skärare
tr: Çim Havalandırma Makineleri

en: Lawn Mowers
xx: Lawn Mowers
cs: Zahradní sekačky
da: Plæneklippere
de: Rasenmäher
es: Cortadoras de césped
fr: Tondeuses à gazon, Tondeuse à gazon électrique, Tondeuse thermique auto-portée, Tondeuse thermique tractée, Tondeuse à gazon mécanique
it: Tagliaerba
ja: 芝刈り機
nl: Grasmaaiers
no: Gressklippere
pl: Kosiarki
pt: Cortadores de grama
ru: Газонокосилки
sv: Gräsklippare
tr: Çim Biçme Makineleri

en: Riding Mowers
xx: Riding Mowers
cs: Ridery
da: Havetraktorer
de: Aufsitzrasenmäher
es: Tractores cortacésped
fr: Tracteurs tondeuses
it: Veicoli tagliaerba
ja: 乗用芝刈り機
nl: Zitmaaiers
no: Traktorklippere
pl: Kosiarki z napędem
pt: Trator de grama
ru: Садовые тракторы
sv: Ridgräsklippare
tr: Mobil Çim Biçme Makineleri

en: Robotic Mowers
xx: Robotic Mowers
cs: Automatické zahradní sekačky
da: Robotplæneklippere
de: Mähroboter
es: Robots cortacésped
fr: Tondeuses à gazon autonomes
it: Robot tagliaerba
ja: ロボット芝刈り機
nl: Robotmaaiers
no: Robotklippere
pl: Kosiarki automatyczne
pt: Cortadores de grama automáticos
ru: Роботы-газонокосилки
sv: Robotgräsklippare
tr: Robotik Çim Biçme Makineleri

en: Tow-Behind Mowers
xx: Tow-Behind Mowers
cs: Tažené sekačky
da: Trukne plæneklippere
de: Quad-Anhänger
es: Cortadoras de césped de arrastre
fr: Tondeuses tractées
it: Falciacondizionatrici
ja: 牽引式芝刈り機
nl: Achtermaaiers
no: Trekk-klippere
pl: Kosiarki ciągnione
pt: Cortadores de grama de empurrar
ru: Газонокосилки-прицепы
sv: Draggräsklippare
tr: Traktör Arkası Çim Biçme Makineleri

en: Walk-Behind Mowers
xx: Walk-Behind Mowers
cs: Sekačky
da: Skubbeplæneklippere
de: Handrasenmäher
es: Cortadoras de césped de empuje
fr: Tondeuses poussées et tractées
it: Tagliaerba a spinta
ja: 手押し式芝刈り機
nl: Handgrasmaaiers
no: Manuelt skjøvne gressklippere
pl: Kosiarki pchane
pt: Cortadores de grama de guiar
ru: Ручные газонокосилки
sv: Handgräsklippare
tr: İtilir Tip Çim Biçme Makineleri

en: Lawn Vacuums
xx: Lawn Vacuums
cs: Vysavače trávy
da: Løvsuger til græsplæne
de: Laubsauger
es: Aspiradoras de césped
fr: Aspirateurs d'herbe
it: Aspiratori per erba
ja: 芝吸引機
nl: Gazonzuigers
no: Plensugere
pl: Odkurzacze ogrodowe
pt: Aspiradores de jardim
ru: Садовые пылесосы
sv: Gräsmattedammsugare
tr: Vakumlu Çim Biçme Makineleri

en: Leaf Blowers
xx: Leaf Blowers
cs: Foukače na listí
da: Løvblæsere
de: Laubbläser
es: Sopladores
fr: Aspirateurs de feuilles, Aspirateur souffleur thermique, aspirateur souffleur broyeur thermique, Souffleur thermique, Aspirateur souffleur thermique\, aspirateur souffleur broyeur thermique
it: Soffiatori per foglie
ja: ブロワー
nl: Bladblazers
no: Løvblåsere
pl: Dmuchawy do liści
pt: Sopradores de folhas
ru: Садовые воздуходувки
sv: Lövblåsare
tr: Yaprak Üfleme Makineleri

en: Outdoor Power Equipment Base Units
xx: Outdoor Power Equipment Base Units
cs: Motorové jednotky multifunkčního zahradního nářadí
da: Grundenheder til elektriske haveredskaber
de: Basiseinheiten für elektrische Gartengeräte
es: Cabezales para equipos motorizados para uso exterior
fr: Éléments de base pour équipement électrique d'extérieur
it: Unità base di attrezzature motorizzate per esterni
ja: ガーデン機器ベースユニット
nl: Basisunits voor elektrische apparatuur voor buitengebruik
no: Sokler til utendørsmaskiner
pl: Głowice do elektronarzędzi ogrodowych
pt: Base para equipamentos elétricos externos
ru: Базовые блоки для электрооборудования для садовых работ
sv: Elutrustningshuvuden för utomhusbruk
tr: Dış Mekan Elektrikli Ekipman Gövdeleri

en: Outdoor Power Equipment Sets
xx: Outdoor Power Equipment Sets
cs: Sady multifunkčního zahradního nářadí
da: Sæt med elektriske haveredskaber
de: Elektrische Kombi-Gartenmaschinen-Sets
es: Juegos de equipos motorizados para uso exterior
fr: Lots d'outils de jardin à moteur
it: Set di attrezzature motorizzate per esterni
ja: ガーデン機器セット
nl: Sets voor elektrisch tuingereedschap
no: Sett med håndholdte hagemaskiner
pl: Zestawy elektronarzędzi ogrodowych
pt: Conjuntos de equipamento para jardinagem
ru: Наборы электрооборудования для садовых работ
sv: Elutrustningsset för utomhusbruk
tr: Dış Mekan Elektrikli Ekipman Setleri

en: Power Sweepers
xx: Power Sweepers
cs: Zametací kartáčové stroje
da: Fejemaskiner
de: Kehrmaschine
es: Barredoras eléctricas
fr: Balais mécaniques
it: Spazzatrice elettrica
ja: パワー スイーパー
nl: Elektrische veegmachines
no: Feiemaskiner
pl: Zamiatarki
pt: Vassouras elétricas
ru: Подметально-уборочные машины
sv: Sopmaskin
tr: Güçlü Süpürücüler

en: Power Tillers & Cultivators
xx: Power Tillers & Cultivators
cs: Kultivátory
da: Elektriske kultivatorer
de: Bodenbearbeitungsmaschinen
es: Motocultivadores
fr: Motoculteurs et rotoculteurs, Microbineuse thermique, Motobineuse thermique, Motoculteur thermique
it: Fresatrici agricole
ja: 耕運機
nl: Elektrische grondbewerkers en cultivatoren
no: Jordfresere og -harver
pl: Glebogryzarki i kultywatory silnikowe
pt: Motocultivadores
ru: Мотоблоки и культиваторы
sv: Jordfräsar och kultivatorer
tr: Elektrikli Fidan Dikme ve Tohum Atma Makineleri

en: Pressure Washers
xx: Pressure Washers
cs: Tlakové hadice
da: Højtryksrensere
de: Hochdruckreiniger
es: Limpiadoras a presión
fr: Nettoyeurs à haute pression, Nettoyeur à haute pression thermique, Karcher, Nettoyeur haute pression
it: Getti a pressione
ja: 高圧洗浄機
nl: Hogedrukreinigers
no: Høytrykksspylere
pl: Myjki ciśnieniowe
pt: Mangueiras de pressão
ru: Мойки высокого давления
sv: Högtryckstvättar
tr: Basınçlı Yıkama Makineleri

en: Snow Blowers
xx: Snow Blowers
cs: Sněhové frézy
da: Snekastere
de: Schneefräsen
es: Fresadoras de nieve
fr: Souffleuses à neige, Fraise à neige thermique
it: Soffiatori da neve
ja: 除雪機
nl: Sneeuwblazers
no: Snøfresere
pl: Odśnieżarki
pt: Ventiladores de neve
ru: Снегоуборочные машины
sv: Snöslungor
tr: Kar Üfleme Makineleri

en: Tractors
xx: Tractors
cs: Zahradní traktory
da: Traktorer
de: Traktoren
es: Tractores
fr: Tracteurs
it: Trattori
ja: トラクター
nl: Tractoren
no: Traktorer
pl: Ciągniki
pt: Tratores
ru: Тракторы
sv: Traktorer
tr: Traktörler

en: Weed Trimmers
xx: Weed Trimmers
cs: Vyžínače
da: Ukrudtstrimmer
de: Rasentrimmer & Freischneider
es: Desbrozadoras
fr: Débroussailleuses, Débroussailleuse, rotofil, coupe-bordure thermique, Débroussailleuse\, rotofil\, coupe-bordure thermique, Débroussailleuse thermique, Coupe bordure thermique
it: Tosaerba a filo
ja: 草刈り機
nl: Tuinscharen
no: Gresstrimmere
pl: Przycinarki do chwastów
pt: Extirpadores
ru: Машины для прополки
sv: Grästrimmers
tr: Yabancı Ot Temizleme Makineleri

en: Outdoor Power Equipment Accessories
xx: Outdoor Power Equipment Accessories
cs: Motorová zahradní technika – příslušenství
da: Elektriske haveredskaber – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Gartenmaschinen
es: Accesorios para maquinaria de jardinería
fr: Accessoires pour équipement électrique d'extérieur
it: Accessori attrezzatura motorizzata per esterni
ja: ガーデン機器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor elektrische apparatuur voor buitengebruik
no: Tilbehør til utendørsmaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do elektronarzędzi ogrodowych
pt: Acessórios para equipamento elétrico de exteriores de residências
ru: Принадлежности для электрооборудования для садовых работ
sv: Tillbehör till utomhusmaskiner
tr: Elektrikli Bahçe Ekipman Aksesuarları

en: Chainsaw Accessories
xx: Chainsaw Accessories
cs: Řetězové pily – příslušenství
da: Kædesav – tilbehør
de: Kettensägenzubehör
es: Accesorios de motosierras
fr: Accessoires pour tronçonneuses
it: Accessori motoseghe
ja: チェーンソー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kettingzagen
no: Motorsagtilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do pił łańcuchowych
pt: Acessórios para serra de cadeia
ru: Принадлежности для цепных пил
sv: Tillbehör till motorsågar
tr: Zincirli Testere Aksesuarları

en: Chainsaw Bars
xx: Chainsaw Bars
cs: Lišty pro řetězové pily
da: Kædesav – sværd
de: Kettensägenschwerter
es: Barras de motosierras
fr: Guide-chaînes pour tronçonneuses
it: Barre motoseghe
ja: チェーンソー用ガイドバー
nl: Kettingzaagbladen
no: Motorsagsverd
pl: Prowadnice do pił łańcuchowych
pt: Barras de serra de cadeia
ru: Шины для цепных пил
sv: Svärd till motorsågar
tr: Zincirli Testere Ağızları

en: Chainsaw Chains
xx: Chainsaw Chains
cs: Řetězy pro řetězové pily
da: Kædesav – kæder
de: Kettensägenketten
es: Cadenas de motosierras
fr: Chaînes de tronçonneuses
it: Catene motoseghe
ja: チェーンソー用チェーン
nl: Kettingen voor kettingzagen
no: Motorsagkjeder
pl: Łańcuchy do pił łańcuchowych
pt: Corrente para motosserra
ru: Цепи для цепных пил
sv: Kedjor till motorsågar
tr: Zincirli Testere Zincirleri